New York, session 2025-2026, S8655.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subject to the provisions of this act, but notwithstanding 2 any other provision of law to the contrary, the city of New York is 3 hereby authorized to transfer and convey to the Allah Youth Center in 4 Mecca Inc. (The Allah School), at no cost to The Allah School, the land 5 occupied openly, exclusively and continuously by The Allah School to The 6 Allah School since 1967 by the city of New York, at 2122 Adam Clayton 7 Powell Boulevard in Manhattan, New York, and further described in 8 section two of this act for the purpose of enabling The Allah School to 9 establish a permanent facility to support the continued provision of 10 educational, social, recreational and developmental community-based 11 services to the Harlem community in Manhattan. This conveyance is in 12 recognition of The Allah School's long-standing service to the Harlem 13 community which dates back to 1967. 14 § 2. The lands authorized by section one of this act to be transferred 15 and conveyed are designated as Block 1932, Lot 29 on the real property 16 tax map of the city of New York for the borough of Manhattan. 17 § 3. The description in section two of this act is not intended to be 18 a legal description and is intended to identify the parcel conveyed. As 19 a condition of the transfer, The Allah School may elect, but shall not 20 be required, to submit to the city of New York, for its approval, an 21 accurate survey and description of the lands to be conveyed, which may 22 be used in the conveyance thereof. 23 § 4. The transfer and conveyance made pursuant to this act shall be 24 subject to the following use restrictions and reverter: 25 (a) The land described in this act shall be used primarily for the 26 purposes of operating and maintaining The Allah School, and for provid- 27 ing any services reasonably related and essential for such purposes, 28 establishing a permanent facility for the provision of services, and for EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13546-01-5 S. 8655 2 1 any additional purposes that would support the long-term sustainability 2 of The Allah School. 3 (b) The conveyance of the land described in this act shall contain a 4 covenant and restriction requiring that the land be used for the 5 purposes set forth in subdivision (a) of this section. In the event the 6 premises are not accepted and/or used for such purposes, ownership of 7 the land shall revert to the city of New York. 8 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.